Hawaii, session 2026, SB2585.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that scientific evidence is essential for determining the effectiveness of any program, policy, or intervention that promotes health and well-being in specific settings and populations.  Interventions backed by strong scientific evidence protect taxpayer interests by guiding the optimal allocation of public funds to maximize positive outcomes and progress.  Evidence-based decision-making can improve the health of all residents of the State by identifying strategies that work for specific populations and detecting preventable differences in health outcomes between groups.  The effective use of evidence-based decision-making requires the systematic gathering, evaluation, and synthesis of evidence from diverse sources, including scientific studies, experimental data, expert opinions, and community feedback.  Application of evidence from various scientific disciplines can direct policymaking to well-tested programs and practices shown to improve physical, behavioral, and mental health. The legislature further finds that the absence of a centralized, user-friendly, and continuously updated repository of these programs inhibits the widespread adoption of proven treatment and prevention strategies.  Artificial intelligence and related machine learning technologies provide powerful tools to enhance the evidence ecosystem by synthesizing complex scientific data, identifying effective programs, and ensuring timely updates as new evidence emerges. The legislature also finds that legislative efforts, including the Foundations for Evidence-Based Policymaking Act of 2018 have created frameworks for evidence-building. However, most government spending, domestically and internationally, is not regularly guided by robust scientific evidence.  Existing online clearinghouses were initially established to increase access to, and the utility of, evidence about what works, but face challenges in user engagement, labor intensity, and adaptation to innovation.  The legislature additionally finds that these gaps are in areas that enhancement by artificial intelligence may address. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the department of health: (1)  In coordination with the department of budget and finance and office of enterprise technology services, and department of human services, to establish and maintain an online clearinghouse enhanced by artificial intelligence of evidence-based treatment and prevention programs; (2)  To support the integration of artificial intelligence in the online clearinghouse; and (3)  To ensure that any artificial intelligence model used in support of the online clearinghouse is subject to regular audits. SECTION 2. The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Chapter artificial intelligence-enhanced online clearinghouse §   -1  Definitions.  For the purposes of this chapter: "Artificial intelligence" means any machine learning and related computational technology designed to augment or expedite human decision-making, information gathering, review processes, and translation of evidence into actionable knowledge. "Cultural responsiveness" means the extent to which a target population's ethnic and cultural characteristics, experiences, norms, value, or behavioral patterns, including relevant historical, environmental, and social forces are incorporated in the design, delivery, and evaluation of targeted health promotion interventions. "Department" means the department of health. "Evidence-based decision-making" means the process of integrating the best available scientific evidence with the expertise of a decision-maker, community needs, and the implementation context to inform policy and funding choices. "Implementation readiness" means the degree to which an evidence-based intervention is available to be implemented as designed and has the organizational capacity to provide materials, training, and information for potential users to adopt and implement the intervention with fidelity. "Online clearinghouse" means the publicly accessible, web-based repository established by the department of health that synthesizes, evaluates, and disseminates evidence regarding the effectiveness of interventions, programs, and policies, including implementation procedures in the State. §   -2  Online clearinghouse; functions; requirements.  (a)  The department, in coordination with the department of budget and finance and office enterprise technology services, and department of human services, shall establish and maintain an online clearinghouse enhanced by artificial intelligence of evidence-based treatment and prevention programs.  The online clearinghouse shall be accessible to the public and provide resources for synthesizing the effectiveness of behavioral, educational, health, and social interventions. (b)  The online clearinghouse shall: (1)  Aggregate and synthesize data from peer-reviewed studies, federal registries, research organizations, and academic databases; (2)  Utilize artificial intelligence tools to continuously analyze and classify programs by level of evidence, population served, implementation readiness, and cultural responsiveness; (3)  Provide user-friendly, interactive, personalized search capabilities for stakeholders, including educators, policymakers, and community organizations; (4)  Include a feedback mechanism to incorporate practitioner experience and local implementation data; (5)  Issue artificial intelligence-generated recommendations according to geographic, demographic, and sector-specific needs; (6)  Provide, where available, summaries of costs, training, and technical assistance resources; and (7)  Allow for updates and cross-linking to scientifically vetted sources of relevant information to support the assessment, implementation, and adaptation of recommendations. §   -3  Online clearinghouses; artificial intelligence; integration.  (a)  The department shall support the development and integration of artificial intelligence and related technologies into the online clearinghouse to: (1)  Augment human expertise in the screening, review, and organization of evidence; (2)  Expedite the review process for evaluation and literature; (3)  Increase the utility and interactivity of any clearinghouse for various end users; (4)  Improve relevance, usability, and broad access to evidence-based information for communities, schools, agencies, funders, and policymakers; and (5)  Guide the user through an evidence-based protocol for the implementation of any program. (b)  The online clearinghouse may serve as a model platform for the integration of artificial intelligence to enhance the translational process and scaling of evidence-based interventions; provided that the resultant artificial intelligence-enhanced clearinghouse shall be applicable to a variety of other issue areas amenable to evidence-based decision-making. §   -4  Interagency coordination; public-private partnerships. (a)  The department shall collaborate with other state agencies, including but not limited to the department of education, department of the attorney general, and department of labor and industrial relations to ensure the comprehensive inclusion of multi-sectoral programs. (b) The department shall encourage any public-private partnership involving academic institutions, nonprofit organizations, and private artificial intelligence developers to contribute to platform development, maintenance, and evaluation. §   -5  Institutional knowledge; evidence-based standards; implementation guidelines; intervention reports.  (a)  The department shall develop and adopt guidelines for the strengthening and preservation of the collective knowledge and experience, research infrastructures, and evidence-based standards with respect to the online clearinghouse and related activities. (b) The department shall consult with scientific experts and relevant agencies and organizations to produce, update, and disseminate evidence standards, implementation guidelines, and intervention reports. §   -6  Audits; annual report.  (a)  The department shall ensure that any artificial intelligence model used in support of the online clearinghouse shall be subject to regular audits to ensure transparency, fairness, and mitigation of bias. (b) The department shall submit an annual report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session. The report shall detail: (1)  The status, effectiveness, and changes implemented in the online clearinghouse under this chapter; and (2)  Any legislative or regulatory action necessary to enhance evidence-based decision-making and research sustainability. §   -7  Rules.  The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to carry out the purposes of this chapter." SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of an artificial intelligence-enhanced online clearinghouse. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________